Florida, session 2026, SB14.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 40 41 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 42 found and declared to be true. 43 Section 2.âMiami-Dade County is authorized and directed to 44 appropriate from funds not otherwise encumbered and to draw a 45 warrant in the sum of $4.1 million payable to Jose Correa as 46 compensation for injuries and damages sustained. 47 Section 3.âThe amount paid by Miami-Dade County pursuant to 48 s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded under this 49 act are intended to provide the sole compensation for all 50 present and future claims arising out of the factual situation 51 described in this act which resulted in injuries and damages to 52 Jose Correa. The total amount paid for attorney fees and 53 lobbying fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent 54 of the total amount awarded under this act. 55 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.